apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>
    ঁংঃঅআইঈউঊঋঌএঐওঔকখগঘঙচছজঝঞটঠডঢণতথদধনপফবভমযরলশষসহ়ঽািীুূৃৄেৈোৌ্ৎৗড়ঢ়য়ৠৡৢৣ০১২৩৪৫৬৭৮৯ৰৱ৲৳৴৵৶৷৸৹৺</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun" />
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun" />
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective" />
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral" />
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun" />
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner" />
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb" />
    <sdef n="post" c="Postposition" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction" />
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb" />

    <sdef n="al" c="Altres" />
    <sdef n="top" c="Toponyms" />
    <sdef n="ant" c="Antroponyms" />
    <sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen" />
    <sdef n="org" c="Organisation" />

    <sdef n="sint" c="Synthetic" />
    <sdef n="psint" c="Partially synthetic" />
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative" />
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative" />

    <sdef n="def" c="Definite" />
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative" />
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive" />
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative" />
    <sdef n="rec" c="Reciprocal" />
    <sdef n="qnt" c="Quentifier" />
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indicative" />

    <!-- will change this asap to itg -->
    <sdef n="int" c="Interrogative" />
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative" />

    <sdef n="fam" c="Familiar" />
    <sdef n="infml" c="Informal" />
    <sdef n="pol" c="Polite" />

    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine" />
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine" />
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine / feminine" />
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter" />

    <sdef n="nn" c="Inanimate" />
    <sdef n="aa" c="Animate" />
    <sdef n="an" c="Animate / inanimate" />
    <sdef n="hu" c="Human" />
    <sdef n="el" c="Elite" />

    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular" />
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural" />
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular / plural" />

    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative" />
    <sdef n="obj" c="Objective" />
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive" />
    <sdef n="loc" c="Locative" />

    <sdef n="p1" c="First person" />
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person" />
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person" />
    <sdef n="impers" c="Impersonal" />

    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive" />
    <sdef n="ger" c="Gerund" />
    <sdef n="ft" c="Future" />
    <sdef n="pres" c="Future" />
    <sdef n="past" c="Past" />
    <sdef n="smpl" c="Simple" />
    <sdef n="pres" c="Future" />
    <sdef n="cnt" c="Continuous" />
    <sdef n="hbtl" c="Habitual" />
    <sdef n="prft" c="Perfect" />
    <sdef n="plprft" c="Perfect" />
    <sdef n="ppst" c="Past Participle" />
    <sdef n="pcnd" c="Conditional Participle" />
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperative" />


    <sdef n="sent" c="End of sentence marker" />
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!৷।]</re>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="sent" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numerals">
      <e>
        <re>[০১২৩৪৫৬৭৮৯]+</re>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[০১২৩৪৫৬৭৮৯]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[০১২৩৪৫৬৭৮৯]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Enclitics -->

    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r />
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Enclitic ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j />ই<s n="adv" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Enclitic ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j />ও<s n="adv" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="টক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বিরল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="psint" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তম</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="psint" />
            <s n="sup" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="পৈতৃক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="m" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ঘন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="sint" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="sint" />
            <s n="comp" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তম</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="sint" />
            <s n="sup" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="মহিলা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="f" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="ও__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <e lm="সংক্ষিপ্ত">
      <i>সংক্ষিপ্ত</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="চিহিত">
      <i>চিহিত</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সফল">
      <i>সফল</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আগের">
      <i>আগের</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বঞ্চিত">
      <i>বঞ্চিত</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কুমারী">
      <i>কুমারী</i>
      <par n="মহিলা__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="খুব">
      <i>খুব</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="তীব্র">
      <i>তীব্র</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ধর্মপ্রাণ">
      <i>ধর্মপ্রাণ</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কঠিন">
      <i>কঠিন</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="গায়েব">
      <i>গায়েব</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মহিলা">
      <i>মহিলা</i>
      <par n="মহিলা__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="গর্ভবতী">
      <i>গর্ভবতী</i>
      <par n="মহিলা__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঘন">
      <i>ঘন</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বৈজ্ঞানিক">
      <i>বৈজ্ঞানিক</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সঠিক">
      <i>সঠিক</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আধুনিক">
      <i>আধুনিক</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সম্ভাব্য">
      <i>সম্ভাব্য</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পালিত">
      <i>পালিত</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পৈতৃক">
      <i>পৈতৃক</i>
      <par n="পৈতৃক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সাম্প্রতিক">
      <i>সাম্প্রতিক</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জীবন্ত">
      <i>জীবন্ত</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="প্রধান">
      <i>প্রধান</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পবিত্র">
      <i>পবিত্র</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঐতিহ্যবাহী">
      <i>ঐতিহ্যবাহী</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বিরল">
      <i>বিরল</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ব্যর্থ">
      <i>ব্যর্থ</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পুরুষ">
      <i>পুরুষ</i>
      <par n="পৈতৃক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অবাধ">
      <i>অবাধ</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="যোগ্য">
      <i>যোগ্য</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিশ্চিত">
      <i>নিশ্চিত</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আফগান">
      <i>আফগান</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অন্ধকার">
      <i>অন্ধকার</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উদ্ভট">
      <i>উদ্ভট</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ঘৃণ্য">
      <i>ঘৃণ্য</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="করুণ">
      <i>করুণ</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বিচিত্র">
      <i>বিচিত্র</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="স্থির">
      <i>স্থির</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সরল">
      <i>সরল</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সুন্দরী">
      <i>সুন্দরী</i>
      <par n="মহিলা__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সুস্পষ্ট">
      <i>সুস্পষ্ট</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সার্বক্ষণিক">
      <i>সার্বক্ষণিক</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বিশুদ্ধ">
      <i>বিশুদ্ধ</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জোরালো">
      <i>জোরালো</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আকৃষ্ট">
      <i>আকৃষ্ট</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="প্রকট">
      <i>প্রকট</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিচ">
      <i>নিচ</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অধীর">
      <i>অধীর</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উষ্ণ">
      <i>উষ্ণ</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="প্রচন্ড">
      <i>প্রচন্ড</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সুইস">
      <i>সুইস</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="মৃদু">
      <i>মৃদু</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="জরুরী">
      <i>জরুরী</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অধুনা">
      <i>অধুনা</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পরিস্কার">
      <i>পরিস্কার</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="তরুন">
      <i>তরুন</i>
      <par n="পৈতৃক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আদিম">
      <i>আদিম</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সিদ্ধ">
      <i>সিদ্ধ</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভাষিক">
      <i>ভাষিক</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দুরূহ">
      <i>দুরূহ</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="রুক্ষ">
      <i>রুক্ষ</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নির্মীত">
      <i>নির্মীত</i>
      <par n="টক__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভয়ানক">
      <i>ভয়ানক</i>
      <par n="ঘন__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নগণ্য">
      <i>নগণ্য</i>
      <par n="বিরল__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="অপরিবর্তনীয়ভাবে">
      <i>অপরিবর্তনীয়ভাবে</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আগে">
      <i>আগে</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="আরো">
      <i>আরো</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="উল্টে যাওয়া">
      <i>উল্টে<b />যাওয়া</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="একেবারেই">
      <i>একেবারেই</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="এভাবেই">
      <i>এভাবেই</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কর্কশভাবে">
      <i>কর্কশভাবে</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কেবল">
      <i>কেবল</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="টি">
      <i>টি</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="দর্শনশাস্ত্রানুযায়ী">
      <i>দর্শনশাস্ত্রানুযায়ী</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="নিশ্চিত">
      <i>নিশ্চিত</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="পূর্বে">
      <i>পূর্বে</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="বাণিজ্যিকভাবে">
      <i>বাণিজ্যিকভাবে</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ভাল">
      <i>ভাল</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="যেখানে">
      <i>যেখানে</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="সমান্তরাল">
      <i>সমান্তরাল</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="স্থায়ীভাবে">
      <i>স্থায়ীভাবে</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ক্রমশ">
      <i>ক্রমশ</i>
      <par n="ও__adv" />
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa" />
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numerals" />
    </e>
